Nebraska, session 109, LB913.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-561, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-561 Sections 71-561 to 71-567 and section 2 of this act shall be known
and may be cited as the Alzheimer's Disease and Other Dementia Support Act.
Sec. 2. The department shall appoint a dementia services coordinator who
shall:
(1) Serve as a referral point for linking families caring for individuals
with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia with supportive services and
resources;
(2) Provide information, counseling, education, and referral about
services and programs, including safe, secure environments that support
individuals and families dealing with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia;
(3) Collect and monitor data related to the impact of Alzheimer's disease
and other dementia on residents of this state;
(4) Evaluate the needs of individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other
dementia and their caregivers and identify the services, resources, and
policies required to address such needs;
(5) Recommend strategies for coordination of services and resources among
agencies involved in the delivery of services to individuals with Alzheimer's
disease and other dementia;
(6) Monitor and assist development and implementation of the state plan
for meeting the needs of individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other
dementia and their caregivers;
(7) Recommend policies, legislation, and funding necessary to implement
the state plan for meeting the needs of individuals with Alzheimer's disease
and other dementia and their caregivers;
(8) Increase awareness and create dementia-specific training to facilitate
access to quality coordinated care for individuals with Alzheimer's disease and
other dementia in the most integrated setting; and
(9) Organize community stakeholders and resources to identify proactive
and effective solutions.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-561, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is repealed.
-1-